Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 17
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

7-58-1701. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it or similar statutes.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1702. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This article modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 (c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 (b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003 (b).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1703. Saving clause.

This article does not affect an action or proceeding commenced, or right accrued, before April 2, 2012.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1704. Effective date.

This article takes effect April 2, 2012.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 818, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.